Hawaii statutes.
§398-6 Certification. (a) An employer
may require that a claim for family leave be supported by written
certification.

(b) For the birth of a child, certification
shall be issued by a health care provider or the family court. For the
placement of a child for adoption with the employee, certification shall be
issued by a recognized adoption agency, the attorney handling the adoption, or
by the individual officially designated by the birth parent to select and
approve the adoptive family.

(c) When leave is to care for a child, spouse,
or parent who has a serious health condition, certification shall be issued by
the health care provider of the individual requiring care. Certification shall
be considered sufficient if it provides information as required by the
director. [L 1991, c 328, pt of §1; am L 1995, c 154, §6]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next